District of Columbia statutes.
22-3227.02

Identity theft.

A person commits the offense of identity theft if that person knowingly:

(1)

Uses personal identifying information belonging to or pertaining to another person to obtain, or attempt to obtain, property fraudulently and without that person’s consent;

(2)

Obtains, creates, or possesses personal identifying information belonging to or pertaining to another person with the intent to:

(A)

Use the information to obtain, or attempt to obtain, property fraudulently and without that person’s consent; or

(B)

Give, sell, transmit, or transfer the information to a third person to facilitate the use of the information by that third person to obtain, or attempt to obtain, property fraudulently and without that person’s consent; or

(3)

Uses personal identifying information belonging to or pertaining to another person, without that person’s consent, to:

(A)

Identify himself or herself at the time of his or her arrest;

(B)

Facilitate or conceal his or her commission of a crime; or

(C)

Avoid detection, apprehension, or prosecution for a crime.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 127b
as added Mar. 27, 2004, D.C. Law 15-106, § 2(c), 50 DCR 9809
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(j), 56 DCR 7413
This section is referenced in § 16-801, § 22-3202, and § 22-3227.01.
D.C. Law 18-88, deleted “; or” from the end of par. (1); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of par. (2); and added par. (3).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2(c) of Identity Theft Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-285, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 204).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2(c) of Identity Thief Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-388, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3382).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2(c) of Identity Thief Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-388, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3382).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(i) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(j) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(j) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).